Idaho statutes. Title 4 LAW LIBRARIES
Chapter 1
STATE LAW LIBRARIES

Section.

§ 4-101. Establishment of a state law library.

A state law library for the use of the courts and members of the bar of this state is hereby established in the city of Boise. The Boise state law library is hereby also designated as the state depository for official publications received from other states and the federal government.

§ 4-102. State publication furnished law library.

A copy of each law, pamphlet or other publication hereafter made by or under authority of the state, or any of its agencies, shall be sent to the state law library.

§ 4-103. Control of the state law library.

The justices of the Supreme Court shall have the control and management of the state law library and shall make such rules and regulations respecting the same as they may deem best. They shall appoint librarians therefor and fix their compensation and the amount of bond required in case they deem bond should be given. Said justices may dispose of superfluous or duplicate publications or other property of said law library, by sale or otherwise as they may deem to be in the public interest. Any moneys so received shall be paid to the state treasurer and apportioned to the general fund.

§ 4-104. State law library fund. [Repealed.]

§ 4-105. Disbursement of funds.

The justices of the Supreme Court shall have the management of all funds belonging to or appropriated for the use of the state law library, and expend and disburse the same for the benefit thereof, as, in their judgment may be best; and upon demand of said justices or any three (3) of them, the state controller shall draw his warrants upon the state treasurer to the extent of such sums as there may be in the treasurer’s hands belonging to or appropriated for the use of said state law library.

§ 4-106. Appropriation of funds. [Repealed.]

§ 4-107. Use and abuse of law library.

Any person may have access to and may use the books in the state law library under such restrictions as the justices of the Supreme Court may prescribe. Any person who shall violate any rule established for the management of the state law library may be denied the privileges thereof. Any person who shall wantonly mutilate or destroy any book or article of furniture, or any pamphlet or paper belonging to the state law library, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished accordingly. Any person who fails to return to the state law library any book taken therefrom by him, within the time prescribed by the rules of said library, shall be liable to the librarian in three (3) times its value to be recovered in a civil action; and if such person be an officer or employee of the state, the same shall be withheld from his salary.

§ 4-107. Use and abuse of law library.

Any person may have access to and may use the books in the state law library under such restrictions as the justices of the Supreme Court may prescribe. Any person who shall violate any rule established for the management of the state law library may be denied the privileges thereof. Any person who shall wantonly mutilate or destroy any book or article of furniture, or any pamphlet or paper belonging to the state law library, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished accordingly. Any person who fails to return to the state law library any book taken therefrom by him, within the time prescribed by the rules of said library, shall be liable to the librarian in three (3) times its value to be recovered in a civil action; and if such person be an officer or employee of the state, the same shall be withheld from his salary.

§ 4-108. Names of new attorneys reported to state treasurer. [Repealed.]